Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Article 2. Reports

§ 28-7-201.
Lobbyist activity reports; contents, form and filing requirements; penalties.

As used in this section “lobby” or “as a lobbyist” means to attempt to influence legislation.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, any person or organization who is registered under W.S.

28-7-101

as a lobbyist shall file a lobbyist activity report with the secretary of state which complies with this subsection. Any organization which employs a lobbyist shall report the information required by subsections (d) and (e) of this section unless this information is reported by the lobbyist. The organization and the lobbyist may make a joint report and the lobbyist may report on behalf of the organization.

Lobbyist activity reports required under this section shall be filed electronically or otherwise annually no later than June 30 for activities during the preceding year May 1 through April 30.

Each lobbyist activity report shall contain a listing of the lobbyist’s sources of funding, each loan, gift, gratuity, special discount or hospitality paid or given, as defined by rules and regulations, to or on behalf of any legislator, state elected official or state employee acting in his official capacity which exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00) in value identified by date, amount and the name of the legislator, state elected official or state employee.

Special events, including receptions, meals, entertainment, attendance at athletic events and other functions, to which members of the legislature, of either house of the legislature, of any committee of the legislature or any regional legislative delegation have been invited shall be included in the report required under this section. The total expenses of activities reported pursuant to this subsection shall be reported by event or function not by individual legislator. The report shall specify the group of legislators invited but is not required to specify the names of individual legislators. Informational publications and other printed materials used for legislative purposes are not reportable under this act.

If the amount of expenses reportable under subsections (d) and (e) of this section is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), no lobbyist activity report is required.

Funding provided by any person or on behalf of the employer of the person to defray the cost of a meeting of any national or regional legislative organization shall not be reported. Any loan, gift, gratuity, special discount or hospitality paid or given to a bona fide charity or to defray the cost of a bona fide charitable event shall not be reported.

Lobbyist activity reports shall be made in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall be open to public inspection. If a named legislator, state elected official or state employee disagrees with the report, the legislator, state elected official or state employee may file a written objection to the report with the secretary of state which objection shall be attached as an addendum to the report filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this act. The rules, regulations and forms shall be designed to ensure maximum compliance.

Amendments to a lobbyist activity report may be filed with the secretary of state at any time. If inaccuracies are found in the report filed or additional amounts required to be reported occur or become known after the report is filed, amendments to the original report or additional reports shall be filed within a reasonable time not to exceed ninety (90) days from the time the inaccuracies or additional receipts or expenditures became known. If the total amount required to be reported is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), including the original reported amount, an amendment need not be filed.

Notwithstanding W.S. 22-24-201(d) and in addition to the lobbyist activity report that may be required under this section, any group of persons which, through a private or public association, raises, collects or spends money for paid advertising in any communication medium or for printed literature to support, oppose or otherwise influence state legislation in the state of Wyoming shall file with the secretary of state a statement of applicable receipts and expenditures.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 112, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.